Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in the Retirement System

47-6-40.
Qualifications for membership; irrevocable election for certain members of General Assembly; membership of persons who cease to become members before age 60; termination of membership; application for additional creditable service.

Each person who first or again becomes a member of the General Assembly on or after July 1, 2012, may make an irrevocable election at the beginning of each term of office to become a member of the Georgia Legislative Retirement System within two months of taking office as a member of the General Assembly. Any member of this retirement system who is elected to a consecutive term of office and who has elected membership in this retirement system shall be deemed to have continuous membership from term to term and shall not be required to reapply each term.

If a member of the system ceases to be a member of the General Assembly before attaining age 60 and for reasons other than death, such member, unless he or she withdraws his or her contributions pursuant to Code Section 47-6-85, shall continue as a noncontributing member of the system. Any such noncontributing member shall not gain any additional membership service. If he or she again becomes a member of the General Assembly and a contributing member of the system, such member shall retain the membership service previously credited to him or her. If a member subject to this subsection withdraws his or her contributions upon ceasing to be a member of the General Assembly, any membership service credited to him or her at the time such contributions are withdrawn shall be forfeited and may not be reestablished if he or she again becomes a member of the General Assembly.

Should any member of the system in any period of five consecutive years after becoming a member be absent from service more than four years, withdraw his or her contributions or become a beneficiary of such system, or die, he or she shall thereupon cease to be a member.

A member of the General Assembly serving on July 1, 2012, may make an irrevocable election to become a member of this retirement system and may obtain creditable service for prior service as a member of the General Assembly as provided in this Code section. In order to obtain such additional creditable service, the member must:

Make application to the board of trustees in such manner as the board deems appropriate not later than December 31, 2012. Such application and payment must be made in conjunction with and simultaneously with the member’s application for membership; and

Pay to the board of trustees an amount determined by the board of trustees to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service as provided in this Code section;

provided, however, that no creditable service shall be granted or obtained pursuant to this Code section if such service may be used to calculate creditable service under any other public retirement system created by this title.

A member of the General Assembly may obtain creditable service for membership in the General Assembly only for the purposes of the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and no service as a member of the General Assembly which is obtained after December 31, 1985, by any such member shall be creditable or used as creditable service for the purposes of any other public retirement or pension system of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 259, § 4; Ga. L. 1971, p. 930, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 611, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 51/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 663, § 2/HB 183.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsection (b) which read: “Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who was a member of the General Assembly on April 1, 1971, and who elected not to be a member of the system as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section could elect, on or before April 30, 1971, to become a member of the system and, upon so electing, become a member under the same conditions as any other member. In order for any such member to receive credit for membership service such member must make the required contributions for such periods, plus interest at the rate of 4 1/4 percent per annum from the time such contributions would have been made had he been a member at that time.”; redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (b) and (c), respectively; and inserted “or she” and “or her” throughout present subsections (b) and (c).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “All persons who are members of the General Assembly on July 1, 1967, shall become members of the system as of such date, except that within six months from such date any such person may irrevocably elect not to be a member of the system. All other persons shall become members of the system on taking office as members of the General Assembly. Staff members shall have the option to become members of the system under the same conditions as elected members of the General Assembly.”; and added subsections (d) and (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 51, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 47-6-42 but actually amended Code Section 47-6-40.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-6-41.
[Reserved] Transition of membership from Georgia Legislative Retirement System to Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia; current beneficiaries; state contributions; rules and regulations.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 52, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1971, p. 107, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 704, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-6-42.
State contributions.

After April 13, 1979, the contributions of the state under this Code section to this system shall be determined by the board each year on the basis of the most recent actuarial valuation. The board shall certify to the legislative fiscal officer the amount of the state’s contributions due to the system. The state’s contributions shall be paid from funds appropriated to the legislative branch of government and shall be in an amount determined by the board to be necessary to cover the costs of financing and administering the system. The legislative fiscal officer is directed to pay to the board the contributions of the state together with an amount necessary to cover the required employer contributions for social security coverage.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 931, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 611, §§ 7, 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 758, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1476, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 52, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 19/HB 460; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 53/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsections (a) and (b); deleted the subsection (c) designation; and deleted former subsections (d) and (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”